Hawaii statutes.
§37-70 Program memoranda. (a) Not
later than the third Wednesday of January of each odd-numbered year, the
governor shall submit to the legislature and to each member thereof, a program
memorandum covering each of the major programs in the statewide program
structure. Each program memorandum will include:

(1) An overview of the program as a whole including a
discussion of:

(A) Objectives.

(B) Component programs.

(C) Departments involved.

(D) Relationships to other agencies and
jurisdictions.

(E) Major activities.

(F) Important external developments affecting
the program.

(G) Significant discrepancies between
previously planned cost and effectiveness levels and those actually achieved.

(H) Trends and comparisons in costs,
effectiveness, or activity data over the budget and planning period.

(2) A statement of the major program changes being
recommended for the budget and planning period to include for each proposed
change:

(A) A brief statement of the recommended
change.

(B) The cost and program performance
consequences of the change over the budget and planning period.

(C) A summary of the analytic rationale for
the change.

(3) A discussion of emerging conditions, trends and
issues including:

(A) Actual or potential impact on the State
and its programs.

(B) Possible alternatives for dealing with
the specific problems occasioned by the emerging conditions, trends, and
issues.

(C) Suggestions for a program of analyses to
resolve the most urgent of the problems.

(4) Appendices as needed to include appropriate issue
papers, special analytic studies, other reports, and crucial source data.

(b) If it is deemed more desirable, the
program memoranda and the six-year program and financial plan may be combined
into a single document containing all the information required for each
separate document. [L 1972, c 72, §4; am L 1974, c 219, §4]

Revision Note

Subsection (a) designation added.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next